Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2903
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Political Subdivisions Construction Alternatives Act:

(1) Construction management at risk contract means a contract by which a construction manager (a) assumes the legal responsibility to deliver a construction project within a contracted price to the political subdivision, (b) acts as a construction consultant to the political subdivision during the design development phase of the project when the political subdivision's architect or engineer designs the project, and (c) is the builder during the construction phase of the project;

(2) Construction manager means the legal entity which proposes to enter into a construction management at risk contract pursuant to the act;

(3) Design-build contract means a contract which is subject to qualification-based selection between a political subdivision and a design-builder to furnish (a) architectural, engineering, and related design services for a project pursuant to the act and (b) labor, materials, supplies, equipment, and construction services for a project pursuant to the act;

(4) Design-builder means the legal entity which proposes to enter into a design-build contract which is subject to qualification-based selection pursuant to the act;

(5) Letter of interest means a statement indicating interest to enter into a design-build contract or a construction management at risk contract for a project pursuant to the act;

(6) Performance-criteria developer means any person licensed or any organization issued a certificate of authorization to practice architecture or engineering pursuant to the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act who is selected by a political subdivision to assist the political subdivision in the development of project performance criteria, requests for proposals, evaluation of proposals, evaluation of the construction under a design-build contract to determine adherence to the performance criteria, and any additional services requested by the political subdivision to represent its interests in relation to a project;

(7) Political subdivision means any city, village, county, natural resources district, metropolitan utilities district, public power district, public power and irrigation district, school district, community college, or state college;

(8) Project performance criteria means the performance requirements of the project suitable to allow the design-builder to make a proposal. Performance requirements include the following, if required by the project: Capacity, durability, standards, ingress and egress requirements, description of the site, surveys, soil and environmental information concerning the site, interior space requirements, material quality standards, design and construction schedules, site development requirements, provisions for utilities, storm water retention and disposal, parking requirements, applicable governmental code requirements, and other criteria for the intended use of the project;

(9) Proposal means an offer in response to a request for proposals (a) by a design-builder to enter into a design-build contract for a project pursuant to the Political Subdivisions Construction Alternatives Act or (b) by a construction manager to enter into a construction management at risk contract for a project pursuant to the act;

(10) Public-private partnership means a project delivery method for construction or financing of capital projects or procurement of services under a written public-private partnership agreement entered into pursuant to section 13-2904 between at least one private partner and a political subdivision;

(11) Public-private partnership contract means a contract between a private partner and a political subdivision that is entered into pursuant to section 13-2911.01;

(12) Qualification-based selection process means a process of selecting a design-builder based first on the qualifications of the design-builder and then on the design-builder's proposed approach to the design and construction of the project;

(13) Request for letters of interest means the documentation or publication by which a political subdivision solicits letters of interest;

(14) Request for proposals means the documentation by which a political subdivision solicits proposals; and

(15) School district means any school district classified under section 79-102.

Laws 2002, LB 391, § 3; R.S.1943, (2003), § 79-2003;

Laws 2008, LB889, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB414, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB847, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 42.
July 18, 2026
Engineers and Architects Regulation Act, see section 81-3401.